src-fst-root.lexc.md
### Multiple Semantic tags:
* +Sem/Act_Fruit
* +Sem/Act_Group Activity and Group
* +Sem/Act_Hum Activity and Human
* +Sem/Act_Plc   A persons job is an activity, and a place as well
* +Sem/Act_Route Activity and Route, ie johtolat
* +Sem/Act_Tool-it
* **+Sem/Amount_Build**   Amount and Building
* +Sem/Amount_Semcon
* +Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Build
* +Sem/Ani_Buildpart
* +Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt
* +Sem/Ani-fish
* +Sem/Ani_Group
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Ani_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt
* +Sem/Ani_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Veh
* +Sem/Aniprod_Hum
* +Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo
* +Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc_Route
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Feat-psych
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon
* +Sem/Body_Body-abstr
* +Sem/Body_Clth
* +Sem/Body_Food
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Body_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Mat
* +Sem/Body_Measr
* +Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Body_Plc
* +Sem/Body_Plc-elevate
* +Sem/Body_Time
* +Sem/Build_Clthpart
* +Sem/Build_Edu_Org
* +Sem/Build_Event_Org
* +Sem/Build_Obj
* +Sem/Build_Org
* +Sem/Build_Route
* +Sem/Build-room_Cat_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat_Ctain
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Obj
* +Sem/Cat_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Cat_Group_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Cat_Edu
* +Sem/Cat_Obj
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj_Org
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Fruit
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Money
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant
* +Sem/Clth_Hum
* +Sem/Clth_Obj-clo
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh
* +Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys
* +Sem/Ctain_Furn
* +Sem/Ctain_Plc
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Curr_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Domain_Food-med
* +Sem/Domain_Hum
* +Sem/Domain_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Drink_Plant
* +Sem/Edu_Event
* +Sem/Edu_Geom
* +Sem/Edu_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Edu_Hum
* +Sem/Edu_Mat
* +Sem/Edu_Org
* +Sem/Event_Food
* +Sem/Event_Hum
* +Sem/Event_Plc
* +Sem/Event_Plc-elevate
* +Sem/Event_Time
* +Sem/Feat-measr_Plc
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Veh
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Hum
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Plc
* +Sem/Food_Obj-surfc
* +Sem/Feat_Plant
* +Sem/Food_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Food_Plant
* +Sem/Food_Sign
* +Sem/Fruit_Hum
* +Sem/Game_Obj-play
* +Sem/Geom_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Geom_Obj
* +Sem/Group_Hum
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Org
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc-abstr
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Group_Org
* +Sem/Group_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Group_Sign
* +Sem/Group_Txt
* +Sem/Hum_Lang
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Time
* +Sem/Hum_Mat_Tool
* +Sem/Hum_Obj
* +Sem/Hum_Org
* +Sem/Hum_Sign
* +Sem/Hum_Part
* +Sem/Hum_Plant
* +Sem/Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Sign
* +Sem/Hum_Tool
* +Sem/Hum_Tool-it = Human
* +Sem/Hum_Veh
* +Sem/Hum_Wthr
* +Sem/Lang_Tool
* +Sem/Mat_Plant
* +Sem/Mat_Txt
* +Sem/Measr_Obj_Time
* +Sem/Measr_Sign = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation)
* +Sem/Measr_Time
* +Sem/Money_Obj
* +Sem/Money_Org
* +Sem/Money_Part
* +Sem/Money_Txt
* +Sem/Obj-play
* +Sem/Obj-play_Sport
* +Sem/Obj_Semcon
* +Sem/Obj_Sign
* +Sem/Obj_Veh
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Org
* +Sem/Obj_Symbol
* +Sem/Org_Rule
* +Sem/Org_Buildpart 
* +Sem/Org_Txt
* +Sem/Org_Veh
* +Sem/Part_Prod-cogn
* +Sem/Part_Substnc
* +Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr
* +Sem/Plant_Plantpart
* +Sem/Plant_Tool
* +Sem/Plant_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Pos
* +Sem/Plc_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Semcon
* +Sem/Plc_State
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Plc_Time
* +Sem/Plc_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Plc_Txt
* +Sem/Plc_Wthr
* +Sem/Prod-audio_Txt
* +Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt
* +Sem/Semcon_Txt
* +Sem/Obj_State
* +Sem/Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Plc_Time_Wthr
* +Sem/Time_Wthr
* +Sem/State-sick_Substnc
* +Sem/Obj-ling_Obj-surfc
* +Sem/Org_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Org_Prod-cogn
* +Sem/Org_Prod-vis

## Punctuation

* **+CLB +PUNCT +HYPH** 
* **+PAR +LEFT +RIGHT** 
* **+URL** 
* **+CLBfinal**  Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, the full stop is ambiguous

## Morphophonemes

* **k4 l4 t4 p4 c4 t4 č4** = these are consonants that change in cg
* **b6 d6 g6** = these are consonants that change in clitics: jiemge, epke
* **i2 i3 u2 â2** = stemvowel changing to e, e.g. kyeli:kyeˊle 
* **i3** =  stemvowel changing to e, e.g. kyeli:kyeˊle (why i3)
* **i4** = this is the postvocalic i consonant, realised as i
* **i5** = comitative suffix-begin in loanwords
* **i6 j6** = these are fake vowel and consonant, to get rules to function for exeptions
* **a5 ä5 á5 e5 u5 o5 y5** = these vowels do not change, e.g. pyerá
* **h5 j5 m5 ŋ5 t5 c5 d5** = these consonants do not change in WG
* **l5 t5 r5 č5 k5 z5** = these consonants do not change in WG
* **∑** used for dynamic compounds, Capital Greek Sigma, Alt-Shift-S

### Archiphonemes

* **^RC** = Root consonant dummy
* **^RV** = Root vowel dummy
* **^SC** = Suffix consonant dummy
* **^SV** = Suffix vowel dummy
* **^VO** = vowel copy

### Triggers

* **^CLEN**  Consonant lengthening in qual WG
* **^CSH**  Consonant shortening (not WG)
* **^FCD**  Final consonant deletion
* **^FVD**  Final vowel deletion
* **^EA** is á and root vowel change in Ill Sg of i-stems
* **^EX** = Stem vowel: i to â where it should have been á, this is Err/Orth only      
* **^RLEN**  Root vowel lengthening (impl. WG)
* **^RVSH**  Root vow shortening
* **^SLEN**  Suffix vowel lengthening 
* **^SVLOW**  Suffix vowel lowering â > á and u > o
* **^SVSH**  Second syllable vowel shortening
* **^VLOW** is Vowel lowering in 3rd sg of contract verbs tuhhid:tohhe
* **^WG**  Weak grade trigger
* **^ÁE** á->e
* **^ÁI** á->i
* **^VHIGH** = hightening of vowels for verbs o to uu, a to oo
* **^VBACK** = back vowels for verbs, ä to a (when needed, normally 2syll a|â is enough
* **^IUML** =  â to e in front of high suffixes 
* **^BLOCK** = This symbol just to block otherwise triggering contexts

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):

* **»** derivation boundary symbols (for hunspell etc. not in use (?))
* **«** derivation
* **%>**  suffix
* **%<**  prefix
* **+Use/NG** not-generate, for ped generation isme-ped.fst
* **+Use/MT**  generate only for MT 
* **+Use/Circ** 
* **+Use/-PMatch** = for preprocessing
* **+Use/PMatch** = for preprocessing
* **@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@** = for preprocessing 
* **@P.Pmatch.Loc@** = 

## Variants within the same paradigm
* **+v1** 
 **+v2** 
 **+v3** 
 **+v4**  for different paradigm variants of same lexeme
* **+Hom1** 
 **+Hom2** for different homonymous lexemes
* **+Allegro** 

## Compound tags

### These tags describe the parts of the compound.

The prefix (before "/") is **Cmp**.

* **+Cmp/Hyph** compounds where first part ends in -
* **+Cmp/SgNom** compounds where first part is Sg Nom
* **+Cmp/PlNom** compounds where first part is Pl Nom
* **+Cmp/Attr** compounds where first part is Attr
* **+Cmp/SgGen** compounds where first part is Sg Gen
* **+Cmp/PlGen** compounds where first part is Pl Gen
* **+Cmp/SplitR** compounds where first part is a split compound hmm
* **+Cmp/Sh** compounds where first part is a short form
* **+Cmp** This tag to mark there is a compound. It comes after the Cmp/xxx tag.

### These tags govern the parts of the compound

The prefix (before "/") is **CmpNP**:
(meaning: this is the normative position of thus tag)

* **+CmpNP/All** - ... in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
* **+CmpNP/First** - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Pref** - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/Last** - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Suff** - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/None** - ... does not take part in compounds
* **+CmpNP/Only** - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never be used alone, but can appear in any position

The prefix (before "/") is **CmpN**:
(meaning: this is the normative position of thus tag)
The tagged part of the compound should make a compound using:

* **+CmpN/SgN** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgG** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlG** Plural Genitive

Unmarked = Default, ie `+CmpN/SgN` for SMN.

The second part of the compound may require that the previous (left part) is:

* **+CmpN/SgNomLeft** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgGenLeft** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlGenLeft** Plural Genitive

## Language tagged names

* **+OLang/ENG** 
* **+OLang/FIN** 
* **+OLang/NNO** 
* **+OLang/NOB** 
* **+OLang/SME** 
* **+OLang/SMA** 
* **+OLang/SWE** 
* **+OLang/UND** 
* **+OLang/RUS** 
* +OLang/PARA - parallelle navn, navnet skal ikke overføres til andre samisk språk

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@C.NeedNoun@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@R.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@D.ErrOrth.ON@**  | Disallow ErrOrth
|  **@C.ErrOrth@**  | Clear ErrOrth flag
|  **@P.ErrOrth.ON@**  | Set positive value for ErrOrth flag
|  **@R.ErrOrth.ON@**  | Reset ErrOrth Flag

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@U.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the two previous ones to block compounding
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root.
|  **@D.CmpHyph.TRUE@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  **@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  **@U.CmpHyph.TRUE@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  **@C.CmpHyph@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  **@P.CmpHyph.TRUE@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  **@N.CmpHyph.TRUE@** | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
